src/fst/morphology/affixes/adpositions.lexc
!! # Postposition inflection
!! ----

!! Komi postpositions inflect for direction.

! ============ !
!! Prep lexica
! ============ !
LEXICON ADP_
+Po: K ;
LEXICON PO_OR_PO_WITH_PX
+Po: PO-PX ;

LEXICON PR_
+Pr: WordEnd ; !! Russian на


! ============ !
!! Postp lexica 
! ============ !

LEXICON PoATag
+Po: A_ ;

LEXICON PoNTag
+Po: N_ ;

LEXICON POSTP_
+Po: WordEnd ;

! Jaska! mikä on näiden kahden +Po -ryhmien erot?
! Poistetaan se ero toistaiseksi

!LEXICON POSTP1a
!+Po: WordEnd ;
! these are:
! ногӧн, выйӧн


!! This contlex allows for relational word which, otherwise, are open 
!! to extensive declension

LEXICON PO_ !!= * **@CODE@**
+Po: WordEnd ;

LEXICON POSTP1  !!= * **@CODE@**
PO_APR ;
PO_APRILL ;
PO-APR-INE ;
PO-COMP ;
PO-EGR ;
PO-ELA ;
PO_ILL ;
PO_INE ;
PO_INS ;
PO_PRL ;
PO-TERI ;
!! these are: 

!! аддза, бӧрті, бокиті, боксянь, дырйи, йитӧдын, 
!! кузя, ног, ньылыд, паныдӧн, пӧлӧн, пыдди, пыр, понда, 
!! ради, уліті, выліті, вывті, вомас, вомӧн
!! пӧвст

LEXICON PO_APR
+Po+Sg+Apr:%>лань PO-PX ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Dial/Injv:%>вань PO-PX ;

LEXICON PO_APRILL
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill:%>ланьӧ K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg1:%>ланям K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl1:%>ланяным K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg2:%>ланят K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl2:%>ланяныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg3:%>ланяс K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl3:%>ланяныс K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+Dial/Injv:%>ваньӧ K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg1+Dial/Injv:%>ваням K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl1+Dial/Injv:%>ваняным K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg2+Dial/Injv:%>ванят K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl2+Dial/Injv:%>ваняныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg3+Dial/Injv:%>ваняс K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl3+Dial/Injv:%>ваняныс K ;

LEXICON PO-APR-INE
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ine:%>ланьын K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg1:%>ланям K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl1:%>ланяным K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg2:%>ланят K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl2:%>ланяныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg3:%>ланяс K ;
+Po+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl3:%>ланяныс K ;


LEXICON PO-COMP
+Po+Sg+Cmpr:%>ся PO-PX ;
! бӧрся, гырся

LEXICON PO-EGR
+Po+Sg+Egr:%>сянь PO-PX ;

LEXICON PO-ELA
+Po+Sg+Ela:%>%{иі%}сь K ;
+Po+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:%>сьым K ;
+Po+Sg+Ela+PxPl1:%>сьыным K ;
+Po+Sg+Ela+PxSg2:%>сьыд K ;
+Po+Sg+Ela+PxPl2:%>сьыныд K ;
+Po+Sg+Ela+PxSg3:%>сьыс K ;
+Po+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:%>сьыныс K ;

LEXICON PO_ILL
+Po+Sg+Ill:%>ӧ K ;
+Po+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:%>ам K ;
+Po+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:%>аным K ;
+Po+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:%>ат K ;
+Po+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:%>аныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:%>ас K ;
+Po+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:%>аныс K ;
! кежлӧ,кежӧ 

LEXICON PO_INE
+Po+Sg+Ine:%>ын K ;
+Po+Sg+Ine+PxSg1:%>ам K ;
+Po+Sg+Ine+PxPl1:%>аным K ;
+Po+Sg+Ine+PxSg2:%>ат K ;
+Po+Sg+Ine+PxPl2:%>аныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Ine+PxSg3:%>ас K ;
+Po+Sg+Ine+PxPl3:%>аныс K ;

LEXICON PO_INS
+Po+Sg+Ins:%>ӧн K ;
+Po+Sg+Ins+PxSg1:%>ӧнням K ;
+Po+Sg+Ins+PxPl1:%>ӧнняным K ;
+Po+Sg+Ins+PxSg2:%>ӧннят K ;
+Po+Sg+Ins+PxPl2:%>ӧнняныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Ins+PxSg3:%>ӧнняс K ;
+Po+Sg+Ins+PxPl3:%>ӧнняныс K ;

LEXICON PO_PRL
+Po+Sg+Prl:%>ӧт K ;
+Po+Sg+Prl+PxSg1:%>ӧттям K ;
+Po+Sg+Prl+PxPl1:%>ӧттяным K ;
+Po+Sg+Prl+PxSg2:%>ӧттят K ;
+Po+Sg+Prl+PxPl2:%>ӧттяныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Prl+PxSg3:%>ӧтис K ;
+Po+Sg+Prl+PxSg3:%>ӧттяс K ;
+Po+Sg+Prl+PxPl3:%>ӧттяныс K ;

LEXICON PO-TRA
+Po+Sg+Tra:%>ті K ;
+Po+Sg+Tra+PxSg1:%>тіам K ;
+Po+Sg+Tra+PxPl1:%>тіным K ;
+Po+Sg+Tra+PxSg2:%>тіат K ;
+Po+Sg+Tra+PxPl2:%>тіныт K ;
+Po+Sg+Tra+PxSg3:%>тіас K ;
+Po+Sg+Tra+PxPl3:%>тіныс K ;

LEXICON PO-TERI
+Po+Sg+Term:%>ӧдзз PO-PX ;

!!
LEXICON PO-SPAT_  !!= * **@CODE@**
PO-SPAT-APR ;
PO-SPAT-APRILL ;
PO-SPAT-APR-INE ;
PO-SPAT-COMP ;
PO-SPAT-EGR ;
PO-SPAT-ELA ;
PO-SPAT-ILL ;
PO-SPAT-INE ;
PO-SPAT-INSTR ;
PO-SPAT-PROL ;
PO-SPAT-TRA ;
PO-SPAT-TERI ;
!! these are: 

!! аддза, бӧрті, бокиті, боксянь, дырйи, йитӧдын, 
!! кузя, ног, ньылыд, паныдӧн, пӧлӧн, пыдди, пыр, понда, 
!! ради, уліті, выліті, вывті, вомас, вомӧн
!! пӧвст

LEXICON PO-SPAT-APR
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr:%>лань PO-PX ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-APRILL
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ill:%>ланьӧ K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg1:%>ланям K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl1:%>ланяным K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg2:%>ланяд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl2:%>ланяныд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg3:%>ланяс K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl3:%>ланяныс K ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-APR-INE
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ine:%>ланьын K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg1:%>ланям K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl1:%>ланяным K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg2:%>ланяд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl2:%>ланяныд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg3:%>ланяс K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl3:%>ланяныс K ;


LEXICON PO-SPAT-COMP
+Po+Spat+Sg+Cmpr:%>ся PO-PX ;
! бӧрся, гырся

LEXICON PO-SPAT-EGR
+Po+Spat+Sg+Egr:%>сянь PO-PX ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-ELA
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ela:%>ысь K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:%>сьым K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ela+PxPl1:%>сьыным K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ela+PxSg2:%>сьыд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ela+PxPl2:%>сьыныд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ela+PxSg3:%>сьыс K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ela+PxPl3:%>сьыныс K ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-ILL
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ill:%>ӧ PO-PX ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:%>ам K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:%>аным K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:%>ад K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:%>аныд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:%>ас K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:%>аныс K ;
! кежлӧ, 

LEXICON PO-SPAT-INE
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ine:%>ын K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ine+PxSg1:%>ам K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ine+PxPl1:%>аным K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ine+PxSg2:%>ад K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ine+PxPl2:%>аныд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ine+PxSg3:%>ас K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ine+PxPl3:%>аныс K ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-INSTR
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ins:%>ӧн K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ins+PxSg1:%>нам K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ins+PxPl1:%>наным K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ins+PxSg2:%>над K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ins+PxPl2:%>наныд K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ins+PxSg3:%>нас K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Ins+PxPl3:%>наныс K ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-PROL
+Po+Spat+Sg+Prl:%>ӧт K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Prl+PxSg1:%>ӧтым K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Prl+PxPl1:%>ӧтным K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Prl+PxSg2:%>ӧтыт K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Prl+PxPl2:%>ӧтныт K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Prl+PxSg3:%>ӧтыс K ;
+Po+Spat+Sg+Prl+PxPl3:%>ӧтныс K ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-TRA ! should be removed
+Po+Spat+Sg+Tra:%>ті K ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-TERI
+Po+Spat+Sg+TerI:%>ӧдзз PO-PX ;

!!

LEXICON POSTP-NOUN
+Po+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Po+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:%>ӧй WordEnd ;
+Po+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:%>ыт WordEnd ;
+Po+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>ыс WordEnd ;
+Po+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:%>ным WordEnd ;
+Po+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%>ныт WordEnd ;
+Po+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:%>ныс WordEnd ;
 POSTP1 ;
+Po+Pl+Prl:%>%^1Cnsэзӧт WordEnd ; 
! гӧгӧр, 

LEXICON PO-PX
: WordEnd ;
+PxSg1:%>ӧй WordEnd ;
+PxSg2:%>ыт WordEnd ;
+PxSg3:%>ыс WordEnd ;
+PxPl1:%>ным WordEnd ;
+PxPl2:%>ныт WordEnd ;
+PxPl3:%>ныс WordEnd ;
! вӧсна, кындзи, моз,  мында, мысьт, серти,

LEXICON PO-TEMP-IS_TRA-INSTR-SG3
+Po+Temp+Tra+Ins+PxSg3: K ;

LEXICON PO-IS_ILL
+Po+Ill: K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
